runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
адвокатувати/Z|w
алгоритмувати/Z|wO
антагонізувати/Z|w
асоціюватися/Z|w
балансуватися/Z|w
бевхнути/Z
бланшувати/Z|wO
борознитися/Z|wM
брунькувати/Z|w
бурмотати/Z|w
валувати/Z|w
вважитися/ZL
вгаювати/Z|w(
вдавати/Z|w(
веляризуватися/Z|w
взаємодіяти/Z|w
взріти/Z
вибріхувати/Z|w(
виварити/ZOM
вивчити/ZMO
видалити/ZMO
визолочувати/Z|w(
викотитися/ZM
вилугуватися/Z
вимочувати/Z|w
виплескати/Z([
випрямити/ZOM
висилюватися/Z|w
вистежувати/Z|w(
витовкмачувати/Z|w(
вихвачувати/Z|w(
вичислювати/Z|w
вияснити/ZMO
відволожуватися/Z|w
віддячитися/Z
відкоментувати/ZO
відманити/Z
відпитувати/Z|w
відринути/Z
відсторонюватися/Z|w
відфугувати/ZO
відшліхтовуватися/Z|w
вклюнутися/Z
вмазуватися/Z|w
воркотати/Z|w
впорядити/ZOM
всилувати/Z
втеплюватися/Z|w
вхибитися/Z
гамувати/Z|w
гілкуватися/Z|w
готовити/ZL|wO
давати/Z|w(
декомунізувати/Z|wO
десантуватися/Z|w
дисимілюватися/Z|w
доварювати/Z|w(
додрукувати/ZO
докуповуватися/Z|w
доносити/ZL|wMO
допридумуватися/Z|w
доснідувати/Zw
дофарбовуватися/Z|w
дудлити/Z|wM
ешелонувати/Z|wO
заанонсувати/ZO
забомбардувати/ZO
завакцинуватися/Z
заволочувати/Z|w
загирити/ZO
загримотіти/Z
задиркотіти/Z
зазимувати/Z
закатовувати/Z|w
заколихуватися/Z|w
закреслитися/ZML
залапковувати/Z|w
замакітрювати/Z|w
замножитися/Z
занечищувати/Z|w(
запарюватися/Z|w
заплюсувати/ZO
запроваджувати/Z|w(
зарискувати/ZO
засинюватися/Z|w
засміятися/Z
застрайкувати/Z
затемнювати/Z|w(
затріщати/Z
захазяйнувати/Z
зациклитися/ZM
зачухмаритися/Z
зашрубувати/ZO
збаламутити/ZLO
зваблюватися/Z|w
згайнувати/ZO
здезертирувати/Z
зжахнутися/Z
зламуватися/Z|w
зменшувати/Z|w(
знайомитися/ZL|w
знесмертити/ZO
зосереджувати/Z|w(
зсудомитися/Z
імпрегнувати/Z|w
інтронізувати/Z|wO
картувати/Z|wO
клястися/Z|w
конденсуватися/Z|w
космологізуватися/Z|w
кулитися/Zw
лиходіяти/Z|w
мадяризуватися/Z|w
мерехтіти/Z|w
молодикувати/Z|w
наблизити/ZLO
навуглецьовувати/Z|w
наддовбувати/Z|w
надстругуватися/Z|w
накинути/ZOn
налаштовувати/Z|w(
намогтися/Z
наплескати/Z[(
нарихтовувати/Z|w
насолоджуватися/Z|w
натомити/ZMO
нацьковуватися/Z|w
недовисвітлити/ZMO
недорозвинутися/Z
нюансуватися/Z|w
обгороджуватися/Z|w
обкрутитися/ZM
обминути/Z
обратися/Z
обтесуватися/Z|w
огорнутися/Z
озеленитися/ZM
омолоджуватися/Z|w
опріснити/ZOM
осмикуватися/Z|w
охопитися/ZM
парируватися/Z|w
перебріхуватися/Z|w
перевчитися/ZM
переділити/ZMO
переінсталювати/ZO
перекривити/ZO
перемальовувати/Z|w(
перенапружитися/ZL
перепарювати/Z|w(
перепризначитися/ZL
пересилюватися/Z|w
пересунутися/ZL
переформатуватися/Z
персоналізуватися/Z|w
підгавкнути/Z
підкльовувати/Z|w(
підмазати/Z(
підпорядкувати/ZO
підсобити/ZM
підхалтурювати/Z|w
плюндрувати/Z|wO
пов'ючити/ZL
повимазуватися/Z
повищати/Z[
повтягувати/Z(
поґуґлити/Z
подоставатися/Z
позадкувати/Z
позасовувати/Z(
позманювати/Z(
поклопотати/Z
покутувати/Z|w
помаринувати/Z
понагарбувати/Z
понаставити/ZLO
пообляпуватися/Z
попаруватися/Z
попестувати/Z
попов'язати/Z
попостогнати/Z
попродавати/Z
порозварювати/Z(
порозтоптувати/Z
поскавчати/ZM
поспорожнюватися/Z
потесати/Z
поукріплювати/Z(
почавити/ZOM
пощеміти/Z
привласнюватися/Z|w
прижовкнути/Z
прилизати/Z(
принатурюватися/Z|w
припустити/ZMO
пристосовуватися/Z|w
притулювати/Z|w(
проакомпанувати/ZO
провішуватися/Z|w
продавитися/ZM
проінтегруватися/Z
прокурити/ZO
промордувати/ZO
пропрасовувати/Z|w
просмажити/ZLO
протвережувати/Z|w
прохилити/Z
пружинитися/Z|w
регламентувати/Z|wO
реструктуруватися/Z|w
розбовкувати/Z|w
розгальмувати/ZO
роздобутися/Z
розквасити/ZLO
розкривавити/ZOL
розлютуватися/Z
рознюхуватися/Z|w
розплюснути/Z
розруйнувати/ZO
розсьорбувати/Z|w
розфокусувати/ZO
розшматувати/ZO
самозабезпечуватися/Z|w
сапнути/Z
систематизувати/Z|wO
сковзнути/Z
скреготнути/Z
смокнути/Z
списати/Z(
сполітизувати/ZO
спрогресувати/Z
стикнутися/Z
строчити/ZM|w
сушитися/ZM|w
тарахнути/Z
тішитися/ZL|w
трепанувати/Z|wO
убожествити/Z
угомонитися/ZM
узолотитися/ZM
улетіти/Z
унизувати/Z|w
уприємнити/ZOM
усиновлювати/Z|w
утеплюватися/Z|w
уцитькувати/Z
фехтуватися/Z|w
футуризувати/Z|w
християнізувати/Z|wO
цькуватися/Z|
шарпонути/Z
шплінтуватися/Z|w
